Hawaii statutes.
[§527‑8] Capacity of transferor. The
capacity required to execute or revoke a transfer on death deed is the same as
the capacity required to execute a will. [L 2011, c 173, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next